Utah statutes.
8-5-7.   Sale of only right to be buried.
Municipalities and cemetery maintenance districts shall sell only the right to
be buried in the cemetery and all cemetery lots or parcels sold by a
municipality after April 29, 1985, or by a cemetery maintenance district after
June 1, 2001 shall be rights to be buried only.  Nothing in this section shall
prevent municipalities or cemetery maintenance districts from imposing
additional terms on the sale of rights to burial.
